District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.13

Deteriorating drugs; sample drugs; returned drugs.

(a)

Drugs which may deteriorate shall at all times be stored under conditions specified on the label of the original container and in accordance with applicable District of Columbia or federal laws or regulations, and shall not be sold or dispensed after the expiration date designated on the label of the original container, and in accordance with applicable District of Columbia or federal laws or regulations.

(b)

Drugs designated “sample” shall not be sold.

(c)

A drug which has been returned after leaving the pharmacy shall not be placed in stock for reuse or resale, except manufacturer packaged unit dose or unit of use drugs which have been unopened and unaltered.

History

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 14, 27 DCR 3528
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2013.

Effect of Amendments

Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.